Hawaii, session 2026, HB2567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that prudent fiscal management and administrative efficiency require reasonable limits on the number of superintendent-level positions within the department of education along with periodic evaluations. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a statutory cap on the number of superintendent-level positions; (2)  Authorize the board of education to periodically perform written performance evaluations of complex area superintendents; and (3)  Appropriate funds to establish two deputy superintendent positions within the office of the superintendent. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Superintendent-level position cap.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall not employ more than       individuals in superintendent‑level positions; provided that this limit shall not apply to temporary superintendent-level positions established by the superintendent in the event of a state of emergency declared by the governor pursuant to section 127A-14; provided further that any appointment to a temporary superintendent-level position established during a state of emergency pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed a term of one year, or until the state of emergency has ceased. (b)  The number of individuals employed in superintendent‑level positions subject to subsection (a) shall include individuals employed in superintendent-level positions created by the department under section 302A-1116. (c)  The department shall include in its annual budget submission a report identifying all superintendent-level positions, their duties, associated salaries, and associated work-related travel expenses. (d)  For the purposes of this section, "superintendent‑level positions" means the superintendent, deputy superintendents, assistant superintendents, and complex area superintendent positions designated at an equivalent classification or compensation level." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-604, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-604 Complex area superintendents.  (a)  The superintendent of education, with the approval of the board, shall appoint complex area superintendents for schools.  The complex area superintendents shall supervise the delivery of administrative and instructional support services within their respective complex areas, including: (1)  Personnel, fiscal, and facilities support; (2)  Monitoring of compliance with applicable state and federal laws; (3)  Curriculum development, student assessment, and staff development services; and (4)  Special education programs and special schools within the complex area. (b)  Every two years, the board may conduct a written performance evaluation of each complex area superintendent; provided that the deputy superintendents shall submit reports on the performance of each complex area superintendent to inform the board's evaluations.  Each written performance evaluation shall include: (1)  Student academic outcomes and progress; (2)  Fiscal management and operational efficiency; (3)  Leadership effectiveness and personnel management; and (4)  Stakeholder engagement, including feedback from school community councils, principals, educators, parents, and the community. The written performance evaluations shall be transmitted to the superintendent and made available to any member of the legislature upon request; provided that any evaluations made available to a member of the legislature shall not disclose any personal information." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) deputy superintendent positions within the office of the superintendent. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.